Maryland, session 2026, HB1271.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
6–226.
(a) (2) (i) This paragraph does not apply in fiscal years 2024 through 2028.
(ii) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and unless
inconsistent with a federal law, grant agreement, or other federal requirement or with the
terms of a gift or settlement agreement, net interest on all State money allocated by the
State Treasurer under this section to special funds or accounts, and otherwise entitled to
receive interest earnings, as accounted for by the Comptroller, shall accrue to the General
Fund of the State.
(iii) The provisions of subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph do not
apply to the following funds:

HOUSE BILL 1271 3
212. the Department of Social and Economic Mobility Special
Fund; [and]
213. the Population Health Improvement Fund; AND
214. THE MARYLAND REPARATIONS FUND.
7–332.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “BOARD” MEANS THE REPARATIONS BOARD.
(3) “FUND” MEANS THE MARYLAND REPARATIONS FUND.
(B) (1) THERE IS A REPARATIONS BOARD.
(2) (I) 1. THE BOARD CONSISTS OF:
A. TWO MEMBERS OF THE PUBLIC, APPOINTED BY THE
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE;
B. TWO MEMBERS OF THE PUBLIC, APPOINTED BY THE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE;
C. SEVEN MEMBERS OF THE PUBLIC, APPOINTED BY THE
LEGISLATIVE BLACK CAUCUS; AND
D. TWO MEMBERS OF THE PUBLIC, APPOINTED BY THE
GOVERNOR.
2. THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE AND THE SPEAKER
OF THE HOUSE JOINTLY MAY APPOINT TWO LEGISLATORS TO THE BOARD TO SERVE
IN AN ADVISORY CAPACITY.
(II) THE GOVERNOR, THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE, AND
THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE JOINTLY SHALL APPOINT A CHAIR OF THE BOARD
FROM AMONG THE BOARD’S MEMBERS.
(3) (I) 1. THE TERM OF A MEMBER IS 6 YEARS.
2. THE TERMS OF THE MEMBERS ARE STAGGERED AS
FOLLOWS:

HOUSE BILL 1271
A. THE TERMS OF FOUR INITIAL MEMBERS SHALL
TERMINATE ON JULY 1, 2030;
B. THE TERMS OF FOUR INITIAL MEMBERS SHALL
TERMINATE ON JULY 1, 2031; AND
C. THE TERMS OF FIVE INITIAL MEMBERS SHALL
TERMINATE ON JULY 1, 2032.
(II) AT THE END OF A TERM, A MEMBER CONTINUES TO SERVE
UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED.
(III) A MEMBER WHO IS APPOINTED AFTER A TERM HAS BEGUN
SERVES ONLY FOR THE REST OF THE TERM AND UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED.
(4) (I) A MEMBER OF THE BOARD MAY BE REMOVED WITHOUT
CAUSE WITH THE APPROVAL OF A THREE–FOURTHS VOTE OF THE BOARD.
(II) THE LEGISLATIVE BLACK CAUCUS MAY REMOVE MEMBERS
OF THE BOARD FOR CAUSE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE PROCESS AND PROCEDURES
TO ADJUDICATE REMOVAL THAT ARE ESTABLISHED BY THE EXECUTIVE
NOMINATIONS COMMITTEES OF THE SENATE AND THE HOUSE OF DELEGATES.
(5) (I) A MAJORITY OF BOARD MEMBERS CONSTITUTES A
QUORUM.
(II) ACTION BY THE BOARD REQUIRES THE AFFIRMATIVE VOTE
OF A MAJORITY OF THE APPOINTED MEMBERS.
(6) A MEMBER OF THE BOARD:
(I) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE
BOARD; BUT
(II) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER
THE STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE
BUDGET, FOR DUTIES PERFORMED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(7) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN THIS SUBSECTION, THE BOARD IS
EXEMPT FROM:
1. TITLE 10 AND DIVISION II OF THIS ARTICLE; AND

HOUSE BILL 1271 5
2. THE PROVISIONS OF DIVISION I OF THE STATE
PERSONNEL AND PENSIONS ARTICLE THAT GOVERN THE STATE PERSONNEL
MANAGEMENT SYSTEM.
(8) THE BOARD IS SUBJECT TO:
(I) THE PUBLIC INFORMATION ACT;
(II) THE OPEN MEETINGS ACT;
(III) THE MARYLAND PUBLIC ETHICS LAW; AND
(IV) TITLE 12, SUBTITLE 4 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(C) (1) THE PURPOSE OF THE BOARD IS TO MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS TO
THE GOVERNOR AND THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY TO PROVIDE GRANTS TO PERSONS
IMPACTED BY HISTORIC INEQUALITY.
(2) TO ACHIEVE ITS PURPOSE, THE BOARD SHALL:
(I) EXAMINE REPARATIONS PAYMENTS MADE AND BENEFITS
OFFERED IN THE UNITED STATES BY THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, STATES, CITIES,
RELIGIOUS INSTITUTIONS, AND COLLEGES AND UNIVERSITIES; AND
(II) USE ANY OTHER INFORMATION NECESSARY TO
RECOMMEND GRANTS UNDER THIS SECTION.
(D) (1) THERE IS A MARYLAND REPARATIONS FUND.
(2) THE PURPOSE OF THE FUND IS TO PROVIDE GRANTS TO PERSONS
IMPACTED BY HISTORICAL INEQUALITY.
(3) (I) THE FUND IS A SPECIAL, NONLAPSING FUND THAT IS NOT
SUBJECT TO § 7–302 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(II) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL HOLD THE FUND
SEPARATELY, AND THE COMPTROLLER SHALL ACCOUNT FOR THE FUND.
(4) THE FUND CONSISTS OF:
(I) REVENUE DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND UNDER TITLE 2,
SUBTITLE 4B OF THE TAX – GENERAL ARTICLE;

HOUSE BILL 1271
(II) MONEY APPROPRIATED IN THE STATE BUDGET TO THE
FUND;
(III) INTEREST EARNINGS; AND
(IV) ANY OTHER MONEY FROM ANY OTHER SOURCE ACCEPTED
FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE FUND.
(5) THE FUND MAY BE USED ONLY FOR:
(I) GRANTS TO PERSONS IMPACTED BY HISTORIC INEQUALITY;
AND
(II) THE ADMINISTRATION OF THE BOARD, USING UP TO 20% OF
THE MONEY IN THE FUND ANNUALLY.
(6) (I) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL INVEST THE MONEY OF THE
FUND IN THE SAME MANNER AS OTHER STATE MONEY MAY BE INVESTED.
(II) ANY INTEREST EARNINGS OF THE FUND SHALL BE
CREDITED TO THE FUND.
(7) EXPENDITURES FROM THE FUND MAY BE MADE ONLY IN
ACCORDANCE WITH THE STATE BUDGET.
(8) MONEY EXPENDED FROM THE FUND IS SUPPLEMENTAL TO AND IS
NOT INTENDED TO TAKE THE PLACE OF FUNDING THAT OTHERWISE WOULD BE
APPROPRIATED FOR A SIMILAR PURPOSE.
(E) (1) GRANTS PROVIDED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL BE USED FOR
INITIATIVES THAT HAVE THE EXPLICIT GOAL OF REPAIRING INEQUITIES THAT
DERIVE FROM HISTORIC DISCRIMINATION.
(2) GRANTS PROVIDED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE USED FOR
LAW ENFORCEMENT ACTIVITY.
(F) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2026, AND EACH OCTOBER 1 THEREAFTER,
THE BOARD SHALL REPORT TO THE GOVERNOR AND THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON ITS
RECOMMENDATIONS FOR GRANTS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:

HOUSE BILL 1271 7
Article – Tax – General
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
(g–1) “Digital advertising gross revenues tax” means the tax imposed under Title
7.5 of this article.
(G–2) “ENDOWMENT EXCISE TAX” MEANS THE TAX IMPOSED UNDER TITLE 7.7
OF THIS ARTICLE.
[(g–2)] (G–3) (1) “Executive Director” means the Executive Director of the
Alcohol, Tobacco, and Cannabis Commission.
(2) “Executive Director” includes a deputy, an inspector, or any other
individual acting within the scope of the Executive Director’s authority.
2–102.
(a) In addition to the duties set forth elsewhere in this article and in other articles
of the Code, the Comptroller shall administer the laws that relate to:
(1) the admissions and amusement tax;
(2) the boxing and wrestling tax;
(3) the digital advertising gross revenues tax;
(4) THE ENDOWMENT EXCISE TAX;
(5) the income tax;
[(5)] (6) the Maryland estate tax;
[(6)] (7) the Maryland generation–skipping transfer tax;
[(7)] (8) the motor carrier tax;
[(8)] (9) the motor fuel tax;
[(9)] (10) the sales and use tax; and
[(10)] (11) the savings and loan association franchise tax.

HOUSE BILL 1271
SUBTITLE 4B. ENDOWMENT EXCISE TAX REVENUE DISTRIBUTION.
2–4B–01.
FROM THE ENDOWMENT EXCISE TAX REVENUE, THE COMPTROLLER SHALL
DISTRIBUTE THE AMOUNT NECESSARY TO ADMINISTER THE ENDOWMENT EXCISE
TAX LAWS TO AN ADMINISTRATIVE COST ACCOUNT.
2–4B–02.
(A) AFTER MAKING THE DISTRIBUTION REQUIRED UNDER § 2–4B–01 OF
THIS SUBTITLE, THE COMPTROLLER SHALL DISTRIBUTE THE REMAINING
ENDOWMENT EXCISE TAX REVENUE TO THE MARYLAND REPARATIONS FUND
ESTABLISHED UNDER § 7–332 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND PROCUREMENT
ARTICLE.
(B) IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT THE REVENUE
DISTRIBUTED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SUPPLEMENT, AND NOT
SUPPLANT, ANY OTHER FUNDING REQUIRED BY LAW.
TITLE 7.7. ENDOWMENT EXCISE TAX.
SUBTITLE 1. DEFINITIONS; GENERAL PROVISIONS.
7.7–101.
(A) IN THIS TITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) “ENDOWMENT” INCLUDES A TRUE ENDOWMENT, A TERM ENDOWMENT,
AND A QUASI–ENDOWMENT.
(C) “TAXABLE INSTITUTION” MEANS A NONPUBLIC INSTITUTION WITH AN
ENDOWMENT, INCLUDING THE PRINCIPAL AND INTEREST EARNINGS, OF AT LEAST
$2,000,000,000.
7.7–102.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, AN EXCISE
TAX IS IMPOSED ON THE ENDOWMENT OF TAXABLE INSTITUTIONS LOCATED IN THE
STATE.

HOUSE BILL 1271 9
(B) THE TAX IMPOSED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION DOES NOT
APPLY TO THE ENDOWMENTS OF PUBLIC INSTITUTIONS OF THE STATE INCLUDING
PUBLIC INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION.
7.7–103.
THE ENDOWMENT EXCISE TAX RATE IS 4%.
SUBTITLE 2. RETURNS.
7.7–201.
(A) EACH YEAR, A TAXABLE INSTITUTION SHALL COMPLETE, UNDER OATH,
AND FILE WITH THE COMPTROLLER AN ENDOWMENT EXCISE TAX RETURN:
(1) ON OR BEFORE APRIL 15 OF THE NEXT YEAR; AND
(2) IF THE COMPTROLLER SO SPECIFIES, BY REGULATION, ON OTHER
DATES.
(B) A TAXABLE INSTITUTION REQUIRED TO FILE A RETURN UNDER THIS
SECTION SHALL FILE WITH THE RETURN AN ATTACHMENT THAT STATES ANY
INFORMATION THAT THE COMPTROLLER REQUIRES TO DETERMINE THE VALUE OF
THE ENDOWMENT.
7.7–202.
A TAXABLE INSTITUTION REQUIRED TO FILE A RETURN UNDER § 7.7–201 OF
THIS SUBTITLE SHALL MAINTAIN MONTHLY RECORDS OF THE ENDOWMENT
ACCOUNT STATEMENTS, INCLUDING DEPOSITS, WITHDRAWALS, INTEREST
EARNINGS, AND ANY OTHER INFORMATION THAT THE COMPTROLLER REQUIRES.
SUBTITLE 3. TAX PAYMENT.
7.7–301.
(A) EACH TAXABLE INSTITUTION REQUIRED TO FILE A RETURN UNDER §
7.7–201 OF THIS TITLE SHALL PAY THE ENDOWMENT EXCISE TAX WITH THE RETURN
IN THE MANNER THAT THE COMPTROLLER REQUIRES.
(B) IF A CORPORATION, OTHER THAN A NONSTOCK, NONPROFIT
CORPORATION, IS REQUIRED TO PAY THE ENDOWMENT EXCISE TAX, PERSONAL
LIABILITY FOR THE TAX AND INTEREST AND PENALTIES ON THE TAX EXTENDS TO

HOUSE BILL 1271
ANY OFFICER OF THE CORPORATION WHO EXERCISES DIRECT CONTROL OVER ITS
FISCAL MANAGEMENT.
(C) IF A LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY, OR LIMITED LIABILITY
PARTNERSHIP, INCLUDING A LIMITED PARTNERSHIP REGISTERED AS A LIMITED
LIABILITY LIMITED PARTNERSHIP, IS REQUIRED TO PAY THE ENDOWMENT EXCISE
TAX, PERSONAL LIABILITY FOR THE TAX AND INTEREST AND PENALTIES ON THE TAX
EXTENDS TO ANY PERSON WHO EXERCISES DIRECT CONTROL OVER THE FISCAL
MANAGEMENT OF THE LIMITED LIABILITY COMPANY OR LIMITED LIABILITY
PARTNERSHIP.
13–201.
In this subtitle, “tax information” means:
(4) any information contained in:
(xviii) a tobacco tax return; [or]
(xix) a transportation services assessment return; OR
(XX) AN ENDOWMENT EXCISE TAX RETURN.
13–825.
(J) THE COMPTROLLER MAY REQUIRE AN INSTITUTION SUBJECT TO THE
ENDOWMENT EXCISE TAX TO POST SECURITY FOR THE ENDOWMENT EXCISE TAX IN
THE AMOUNT THE COMPTROLLER DETERMINES.
13–1001.
(H) AN INSTITUTION THAT IS REQUIRED TO FILE AN ENDOWMENT EXCISE
TAX RETURN AND THAT WILLFULLY FAILS TO FILE THE RETURN AS REQUIRED
UNDER TITLE 7.7 OF THIS ARTICLE IS GUILTY OF A MISDEMEANOR AND ON
CONVICTION IS SUBJECT TO A FINE NOT EXCEEDING $5,000 OR IMPRISONMENT NOT
EXCEEDING 5 YEARS OR BOTH.
13–1002.
(a) A person who willfully files a false alcoholic beverage tax return OR AN
INSTITUTION THAT WILLFULLY FILES A FALSE ENDOWMENT EXCISE TAX RETURN is
guilty of perjury and, on conviction, is subject to the penalty for perjury.
(b) A person, including an officer of a corporation, who willfully files a false digital
advertising gross revenues tax return, a false financial institution franchise tax return, a

HOUSE BILL 1271 11
false public service company franchise tax return, or a false income tax return with the
intent to evade the payment of tax due under this article is guilty of perjury and, on
conviction, is subject to the penalty for perjury.
(c) Subsections (a) and (b) of this section apply to the alcoholic beverage, digital
advertising gross revenues, ENDOWMENT EXCISE TAX, financial institution franchise,
public service company franchise, and income taxes.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Tax – General
13–508.
(a) Within 30 days after the date on which a notice of assessment of the
admissions and amusement tax, alcoholic beverage tax, boxing and wrestling tax, digital
advertising gross revenues tax, ENDOWMENT EXCISE TAX, income tax, motor carrier tax,
motor fuel tax, public service company franchise tax, financial institution franchise tax,
sales and use tax, or tobacco tax is mailed, a person or governmental unit against which
the assessment is made may submit to the tax collector:
(1) an application for revision of the assessment; or
(2) except for the public service company franchise tax, if the assessment
is paid, a claim for refund.
(c) The Comptroller or an employee of the Comptroller’s office expressly
designated by the Comptroller promptly:
(1) (i) shall hold an informal hearing on a person’s or governmental
unit’s admissions and amusement tax, alcoholic beverage tax, boxing and wrestling tax,
digital advertising gross revenues tax, ENDOWMENT EXCISE TAX, income tax, motor
carrier tax, motor fuel tax, sales and use tax, or tobacco tax application for revision or claim
for refund under subsection (a) of this section; and
(ii) after the hearing:
1. shall act on the application for revision; and
2. may assess any additional tax, penalty, and interest due;
and
(2) shall mail to the person or governmental unit a notice of final
determination.
13–509.

HOUSE BILL 1271
(a) Notwithstanding a person’s failure to file a timely application for revision or
claim for refund of an assessment of the admissions and amusement tax, alcoholic beverage
tax, boxing and wrestling tax, digital advertising gross revenues tax, ENDOWMENT
EXCISE TAX, income tax, motor carrier tax, motor fuel tax, sales and use tax, or tobacco tax
under § 13–508(a) of this subtitle, the Comptroller or the Comptroller’s designee may issue
an order decreasing or abating an assessment to correct an erroneous assessment.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Tax – General
13–508.
(a) Within 30 days after the date on which a notice of assessment of the
admissions and amusement tax, alcoholic beverage tax, boxing and wrestling tax, digital
advertising gross revenues tax, ENDOWMENT EXCISE TAX, hotel rental tax, income tax,
motor carrier tax, motor fuel tax, public service company franchise tax, financial institution
franchise tax, sales and use tax, or tobacco tax is mailed, a person or governmental unit
against which the assessment is made may submit to the tax collector:
(1) an application for revision of the assessment; or
(2) except for the public service company franchise tax, if the assessment
is paid, a claim for refund.
(c) The Comptroller or an employee of the Comptroller’s office expressly
designated by the Comptroller promptly:
(1) (i) shall hold an informal hearing on a person’s or governmental
unit’s admissions and amusement tax, alcoholic beverage tax, boxing and wrestling tax,
digital advertising gross revenues tax, ENDOWMENT EXCISE TAX, hotel rental tax, income
tax, motor carrier tax, motor fuel tax, sales and use tax, or tobacco tax application for
revision or claim for refund under subsection (a) of this section; and
(ii) after the hearing:
1. shall act on the application for revision; and
2. may assess any additional tax, penalty, and interest due;
and
(2) shall mail to the person or governmental unit a notice of final
determination.
13–509.

HOUSE BILL 1271 13
(a) Notwithstanding a person’s failure to file a timely application for revision or
claim for refund of an assessment of the admissions and amusement tax, alcoholic beverage
tax, boxing and wrestling tax, digital advertising gross revenues tax, ENDOWMENT
EXCISE TAX, hotel rental tax, income tax, motor carrier tax, motor fuel tax, sales and use
tax, or tobacco tax under § 13–508(a) of this subtitle, the Comptroller or the Comptroller’s
designee may issue an order decreasing or abating an assessment to correct an erroneous
assessment.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall be
applicable to all taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 4 of this Act shall take
effect July 1, 2027, the effective date of Chapter 638 of the Acts of the General Assembly of
2025. If the effective date of Chapter 638 is amended, Section 4 of this Act shall take effect
on the taking effect of Chapter 638.
SECTION 7. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in Section
6 of this Act, this Act shall take effect July 1, 2026. Section 3 of this Act shall remain
effective until the taking effect of Section 4 of this Act. If Section 4 of this Act takes effect,
Section 3 of this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.